District of Columbia statutes.
1-303.42

Expenditures for emergencies.

When required by the public exigencies to meet conditions caused by emergencies such as riot, pestilence, public insanitary conditions, flood, fire, storm, and similar disasters, the Mayor of the District of Columbia, pursuant to regulations prescribed by the Council of the District of Columbia, is authorized to expend such amounts as may be necessary without regard to advertising provisions of § 2-225.05.

Oct. 26, 1973, 87 Stat. 504, Pub. L. 93-140, § 1
1981 Ed., § 1-320.
1973 Ed., § 1-226a.
This section originated at a time when local government powers were delegated to the District of Columbia Council and to a Commissioner of the District of Columbia. The District of Columbia Self-Government and Governmental Reorganization Act, 87 Stat. 818, § 711 ( D.C. Code, § 1-207.11), abolished the District of Columbia Council and the Office of Commissioner of the District of Columbia. These branches of government were replaced by the Council of the District of Columbia and the Office of Mayor of the District of Columbia, respectively. Accordingly, and also pursuant to § 714(a) of such Act ( D.C. Code, § 1-207.14(a)), appropriate changes in terminology were made in this section.